California, session 20252026, AB1764.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2206 of the Elections Code is amended to read:2206. (a) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to facilitate the availability of death statistics from the State Department of Health Care Services. The Secretary of State or county elections officials shall use data obtained pursuant to this subdivision to cancel the affidavits of registration of deceased persons.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the Secretary of State may enter into an agreement with the federal Social Security Administration to facilitate the availability of death statistics.(2) If the Secretary of State enters into an agreement pursuant to paragraph (1), the Secretary of State shall adopt regulations governing the electronic transfer of death statistics from the federal Social Security Administration.(c)(3) The Secretary of State or county elections officials shall use data obtained pursuant to this section the data of death statistics from the federal Social Security Administration to cancel the affidavits of registrations registration of deceased persons.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.